Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 509A of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Department of Corrections to be designated the "Prison
Acquisition Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund,
not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all
monies designated for deposit by law. All monies accruing to the
credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Department for the purpose of, on behalf of the
state, completing a purchase of a prison including associated
property and equipment from a private prison contractor.

Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 509, as last
amended by Section 1, Chapter 22, O.S.L. 2023 (57 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 509), is amended to read as follows:
Section 509. A. The Department of Corrections is authorized to
maintain the following facilities in this state:
1. Oklahoma State Penitentiary in McAlester;
2. Oklahoma State Reformatory in Granite;
3. Oklahoma City Community Corrections Center in Oklahoma City;
4. Lexington Assessment and Reception Center in Lexington;
5. 4. Jackie Brannon Correctional Center in McAlester;
6. 5. Joseph Harp Correctional Center in Lexington;
7. 6. Howard McLeod Correctional Center in Atoka;
8. 7. Mack H. Alford Correctional Center in Stringtown;
9. 8. Jim E. Hamilton Correctional Center in Hodgen;
10. 9. Mabel Bassett Correctional Center in McLoud;
11. 10. R.B. “Dick” Conner Correctional Center in Hominy;
12. 11. James Crabtree Correctional Center in Helena;
13. 12. Jess Dunn Correctional Center in Taft;
14. 13. Northeast Oklahoma Community Corrections Center in
Vinita;
15. North Fork Correctional Center in Sayre;
16. 14. John Lilley Correctional Center in Boley;
ENR. H. B. NO. 2780 Page 2

17. 15. Dr. Eddie Warrior Correctional Center in Taft;
18. 16. Clara Waters Community Corrections Center in Oklahoma
City;
19. 17. Lawton Community Corrections Center in Lawton;
20. 18. Enid Community Corrections Center in Enid;
21. 19. Union City Community Corrections Center in Union City;
and
22. 20. Charles E. “Bill” Johnson Correctional Center in Alva;
and
21. A facility purchased pursuant to the provisions of Enrolled
House Bill No. 2780 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature.
B. The Department shall be the legal successor of and, except
as otherwise provided in the Oklahoma Corrections Act of 1967, shall
have the powers and duties vested by law in the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services in all matters relating to penal
institutions, heretofore or hereafter established by the Department,
which institutions and community corrections centers shall be under
the administrative direction and control of the Department.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2780 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2780 Page 4